tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "бол = be":
    бол<v><iv><aor> : болно
    бол<v><iv><aor><neg> : болохгүй
    бол<v><iv><ifi> : боллоо
    бол<v><iv><past> : болсон
    бол<v><iv><past> : болов
    бол<v><iv><past><evid> : болжээ
    бол<v><iv><imp> : болоорой
    бол<v><iv><sug> : болооч
    бол<v><iv><hab> : болдог
    бол<v><iv><gna> : болж

 "гар = leave":
    гар<v><iv><aor> : гарна
    гар<v><iv><aor><neg> : гарахгүй
    гар<v><iv><ifi> : гарлаа
    гар<v><iv><past> : гарсан
    гар<v><iv><past> : гарав
    гар<v><iv><past><evid> : гаржээ
    гар<v><iv><imp> : гараарай
    гар<v><iv><sug> : гараач
    гар<v><iv><hab> : гардаг
    гар<v><iv><gna> : гарч
